Utah statutes.
32B-1-504.   General requirements on attire and conduct.

The following attire and conduct on premises or at an event regulated by the commission under this title are considered contrary to the public health, peace, safety, welfare, and morals, and are prohibited:

(1)  employing or using a person in the sale, offer for sale, or furnishing of an alcoholic product while the person is in:

(a)  a state of nudity;

(b)  a state of seminudity; or

(c)  performance attire or clothing that exposes to view any portion of:

(i)  the female breast below the top of the areola; or

(ii)  the cleft of the buttocks;

(2)  employing or using the services of a person to mingle with patrons while the person is in:

(a)  a state of nudity;

(b)  a state of seminudity; or

(c)  performance attire or clothing that exposes to view any portion of:

(i)  the female breast below the top of the areola; or

(ii)  the cleft of the buttocks;

(3)  encouraging or permitting a person to:

(a)  engage in or simulate an act of:

(i)  sexual intercourse;

(ii)  masturbation;

(iii)  sodomy;

(iv)  bestiality;

(v)  oral copulation;

(vi)  flagellation; or

(vii)  a sexual act that is prohibited by Utah law; or

(b)  touch, caress, or fondle the breast, buttocks, anus, or genitals of any other person;

(4)  permitting a person to wear or use a device or covering that:

(a)  is exposed to view; and

(b)  simulates all or any portion of the human genitals, anus, pubic area, or female breast;

(5)  permitting a person to use an artificial device or inanimate object to depict an act prohibited by this section;

(6)  permitting a person to remain on premises or at an event who exposes to public view any portion of that person's:

(a)  genitals, pubic area, or anus; or

(b)  in the case of a female, the areola and nipple of the breast; or

(7)  showing a film, still picture, electronic reproduction, or other visual reproduction depicting:

(a)  an act or simulated act of:

(i)  sexual intercourse;

(ii)  masturbation;

(iii)  sodomy;

(iv)  bestiality;

(v)  oral copulation;

(vi)  flagellation; or

(vii)  a sexual act that is prohibited by Utah law;

(b)  a person being touched, caressed, or fondled on the breast, buttocks, anus, or genitals;

(c)  a scene wherein an artificial device or inanimate object is employed to depict, or a drawing is employed to portray, an act prohibited by this section; or

(d)  a scene wherein a person displays the genitals or anus.

